District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.01

Goal; “available work force” defined.

The goal of affirmative action in employment throughout the District government is, and must continue to be, full representation, in jobs at all salary and wage levels and scales, in accordance with the representation of all groups in the available work force of the District of Columbia, including, but not limited to, Blacks, Whites, Spanish-speaking Americans, Native Americans, Asian Americans, females, and males. As used in §§ 1-521.01 to 1-521.08, “available work force” means the total population of the District of Columbia between the ages of 18 and 65.

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 2, 22 DCR 6538
Merit system, continuation of existing laws, see § 1-632.06.
Merit system, equal employment opportunity, affirmative action, see § 1-607.01.
This section is referenced in § 1-607.01 and § 1-632.06.
1981 Ed., § 1-507.
1973 Ed., § 1-320a.